Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-804
County court and district court; jurisdiction.

Each county court and district court shall exercise the jurisdiction conferred by the Conciliation Court Law and while sitting in the exercise of such jurisdiction shall be known and referred to as the conciliation court. All petitions and filings shall be made with the clerk of the district court and may be heard by the county court or the district court as provided in section 25-2740.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 4, p. 655;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 23.